Louisiana, session 2026, SB517.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:2740.67(C)(1), (2), (3) and (4) are hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
§2740.67. Baton Rouge North Economic Development District
* * *
C. Governance. (1) In order to provide for the orderly planning, development,
acquisition, construction, and effectuation of the services, improvements, and
facilities to be furnished by the district and to provide for the representation in the
affairs of the district of those persons and interests immediately concerned with and
affected by the purposes and development of the district, the district shall be
managed by a nine-member eleven-member board of commissioners, referred to in
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-463 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 517
this Section as the "board". The board shall be comprised of members as follows:
(a) One member shall be appointed by the state representative for House
District No. 29, who shall be a representative of the business community, on a
rotating basis beginning in 2022 and every other year thereafter.
(b) Two members shall be appointed by the state senator for Senate District
No. 15.
(c) One member with a background in economic development shall be
appointed by the mayor-president of the parish of East Baton Rouge.
(d) One member, from a list of three nominees submitted by a nominating
subcommittee established by the board, shall be appointed with a community
development background located within the district to be selected by a subcommittee
formed by the board.
(e) One member shall be appointed by the owner of the largest parcel of land
located within the district.
(f) One member shall be appointed by the state representative for House
District No. 61, on a rotating basis beginning in 2022 and every other year thereafter.
(g) One member shall be appointed by the state representative for House
District No. 63, on a rotating basis beginning in 2022 and every other year thereafter.
(h) One member shall be appointed by the state representative for House
District No. 67, on a rotating basis beginning in 2023 and every other year thereafter.
(i) One member shall be appointed by the state representative for House
District No. 101, on a rotating basis beginning in 2023 and every other year
thereafter governing authority of the parish of East Baton Rouge.
(j) One member shall be appointed by the state senator for Senate District No.
14.
* * *
(2) Members shall serve two -year terms. Members shall serve four-year
terms. No member shall serve more than two-consecutive four-year terms. A
partial term of two years or less shall not count toward the term limit. Service
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-463 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 517
for more than two years of a partial term limit shall count as one consecutive
term. Two members shall serve an initial term of one year; two member shall
serve an initial term of two years; three member shall serve an initial term of
three years; four member shall serve an initial term of four years, all as
determined by lot at the first meeting of the board. Thereafter, each
reappointment to a seat shall be for a four-year term expiring in the same cycle
year applicable to that seat.
(3) Board members shall be eligible for reappointment, but the cumulative
term of service shall not exceed four years.
(4) Any vacancy which occurs prior to the expiration of the term for which
a member of the board has been appointed shall be filled for the remainder of the
unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment. If the vacancy is
not filled within sixty days, the governor shall appoint an interim member from
a list of three nominees provided by the original appointing authority.
* * *